Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4801
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 29-4801 to 29-4807:

(1) Case plan means a set of goals, conditions, and programs that is:

(a) Based on a professional risk and needs assessment;

(b) Tailored to the specific risks and needs of the veteran; and

(c) Developed in collaboration with the veteran;

(2) Condition from military service means substance-use disorder, military sexual trauma, traumatic brain injury, post-traumatic stress disorder, or another mental health condition that is related to an individual's military service in some manner and includes psychological effects from a veteran's time in service as well as from the period of family separation related to deployment;

(3) Intimate partner has the same meaning as in section 28-323;

(4) Serious bodily injury has the same meaning as in section 28-109;

(5) Sexual contact and sexual penetration have the same meanings as in section 28-318;

(6) Veteran means an individual who:

(a) Is serving in the United States Armed Forces, including any reserve component or the National Guard;

(b) Has served in such armed forces and was discharged or released from such service under conditions other than dishonorable; or

(c) Has served in such armed forces and received a dishonorable discharge and such individual has been diagnosed with substance-use disorder, military sexual trauma, traumatic brain injury, post-traumatic stress disorder, or another mental health condition; and

(7) Veteran justice program means the program described in sections 29-4802 to 29-4804 through which a veteran may request a court to defer entry of judgment of conviction for an offense pending completion of the program, and upon successful completion, avoid entry of judgment of conviction.

Laws 2024, LB253, § 1.
Sections 29-4801 to 29-4807 apply on and after July 1, 2027.